Washington statutes.
RCW 36.28.060

Duplicate receipts—Penalties.

(1) The sheriff shall make duplicate receipts for all payments for his or her services specifying the particular items thereof, at the time of payment, whether paid by virtue of the laws of this state or of the United States. Such duplicate receipts shall be numbered consecutively for each month commencing with number one. One of such receipts shall have written or printed upon it the word "original"; and the other shall have written or printed upon it the word "duplicate."

(2) At the time of payment of any fees, the sheriff shall deliver to the person making payment, either personally or by mail, the copy of the receipt designated "duplicate."

(3) The receipts designated "original" for each month shall be attached to the verified statement of fees for the corresponding month and the sheriff shall file with the county treasurer of his or her county all original receipts for each month with such verified statement.

(4) A sheriff shall not receive his or her salary for the preceding month until the provisions of this section have been complied with.

(5) Any sheriff violating this section, or failing to perform any of the duties required thereby, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined in any sum not less than ten dollars nor more than fifty dollars for each offense.

[ 2003 c 53 s 202; 1963 c 4 s 36.28.060. Prior: (i) 1909 c 105 s 1; RRS s 4161. (ii) 1909 c 105 s 2; RRS s 4162.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.